Alabama, session 2026rs, SB72.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 16-33D-3 and 16-33D-6 of the Code
of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§16-33D-3
For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms
have the following meanings:
(1) ACADEMIC TERM. A portion of an academic year, such
as a quarter or semester, during which an institution of
higher education holds classes including, but not limited to,
Fall, Winter, Spring, or Summer semesters.
(2) ADULT LEARNER. An individual who is 25 22 years of
age or older and returning to college.
(3) ALABAMA RESIDENT. An individual who has been
classified as an in-state resident by an authorized
institution, who has established residency within this state
for at least a 12-month period prior to the beginning of the
term for which financial assistance is requested, and who is
in this state for other than a temporary purpose.
(4) APPROVED INSTITUTION. A state-supported institution
of higher education or a private nonprofit institution of
higher education that satisfies all of the following:
a. Is accredited by the Southern Association of
Colleges and Schools Commission on Colleges, or the Council on
Occupational Education.
b. Is eligible to receive Title IV federal student aid
program funds.
Page 2

program funds.
SB72 INTRODUCED
c. Maintains its primary headquarters in Alabama.
(5) AUTHORIZED INSTITUTION. An approved institution
that files a signed agreement with the commission to comply
with all rules and procedures of the ReEngage Alabama Grant
Program as provided by the commission.
(6) COMMISSION. The Alabama Commission on Higher
Education.
(7) CONTINUOUS ENROLLMENT. When an adult learner is
making academic progress toward degree completion without a
stop-out in enrollment of more than one consecutive semester
or quarter, such as Fall/Winter to Spring, Spring to
Summer/Fall, or Summer to Fall.
(8) ELIGIBLE PROGRAM. A nonsectarian, secular
educational program that is aligned with Alabama's high demand
workforce needs adopted by the Alabama Committee on
Credentialing and Career Pathways.
(9) ELIGIBLE STUDENT. An individual who completed the
Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA), and who is
in either of the following:
a. In pursuit of his or her first associate or
baccalaureate degree, who satisfies the criteria set out in
this chapter, and who is found to be eligible by rules adopted
by the commission.
b. In pursuit of his or her first baccalaureate degree
following a two-year stop-out period after receiving his or
her first associate degree and did not previously receive a
grant award, satisfies the criteria set out in this chapter,
and is found to be eligible by rules adopted by the
Page 3

and is found to be eligible by rules adopted by the
SB72 INTRODUCED
commission.
(10) GRANT. A financial award by the State of Alabama
to defray the cost of tuition and mandatory fees to an
eligible adult learner who is currently enrolled in an
authorized institution.
(11) PROGRAM. The ReEngage Alabama Grant Program
created by this chapter.
(12) YEAR. An academic year that shall be divided into
Fall, Winter, Spring, and Summer terms. The term does not mean
calendar or fiscal year.
"§16-33D-6
(a) The program shall be used to provide grant award
payments for eligible adult learners up to the maximum award
amount of three thousand dollars ($3,000) for universities and
one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for community
100 colleges per academic semester for a full-time student.
101 Proportional awards shall be given for students taking six to
102 11 hours and students enrolled in less common academic terms,
103 such as quarters, Summer terms, and intersessions.
104 (b)(1) Each grant shall be renewable for the number of
105 terms normally required by the institution for the course of
106 study in which the adult learner is enrolled as long as the
107 student is continuously enrolled until the student receives an
108 either of the following:
109 a. His or her first associate degree or a baccalaureate
110 degree.
111 b. His or her first baccalaureate degree following a
112 two-year stop-out period after receiving his or her first
Page 4

two-year stop-out period after receiving his or her first
SB72 INTRODUCED
113 associate degree without previously receiving a grant award.
114 (2) The commission shall grant a renewal upon
115 verification that the student remains an eligible student.
116 (c) Grant award payments shall be distributed directly
117 to the approved institution on behalf of the student during
118 the applicable year.
119 (d) The requirements of this chapter are contingent
120 upon available funding for the program.
121 (e) The commission shall determine the necessary
122 procedures for awarding grant award payments if the number of
123 eligible applicants and recipients exceeds available funding.
124 (f) Any funds appropriated to the program shall be
125 nonreverting.
126 (g) A percentage of the grant program's appropriations
127 may be expended for the operation and maintenance of the
128 program.
129 (h) Each authorized institution that enrolls an adult
130 learner who is eligible for the tuition and mandatory fees
131 benefits provided by this program shall take necessary action
132 to ensure that the student is aware of all other benefits that
133 he or she may be entitled to under any other federal and state
134 educational benefits, and any student grant or scholarship. In
135 order to receive the benefits provided by this program, the
136 student shall take the necessary steps to utilize all of the
137 above benefits."
138 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
139 1, 2026.
Page 5